Utah statutes.
51-5-6.   Accounting principles and specific accounting and financial
reporting procedures.
(1)  The Division of Finance shall:
(a)  use generally accepted accounting principles applicable to governmental
units in:
(i)  its accounting procedures; and
(ii)  its reports of the state's financial position and results of operations
in each fiscal period; and
(b)  note any deviation for budget purposes in the state's financial
statements.
(2)  Unless otherwise required by generally accepted accounting principles,
the following specific procedures shall be implemented:
(a)  The Division of Finance shall use the basis of accounting established by
GASB for financial reporting of each fund type.
(b)  The Division of Finance shall:
(i)  calculate the liabilities associated with postemployment benefits by
applying:
(A)  GASB standards as they become available; or
(B)  appropriate standards available for private business if GASB standards
are not available;
(ii)  recognize all liabilities associated with postemployment benefits in a
separate fund for budget purposes and in the General Fund or other funds as
required by GASB for reporting purposes;
(iii)  provide for an ongoing labor additive beginning in the budget request
for fiscal year 1995 to charge all federal, state, or other programs at a rate
sufficient to cover the annual change in the postemployment benefits
liabilities of the separate budget fund; and
(iv)  provide for ongoing payments against the postemployment liabilities
budget fund as employees qualify for receiving the postemployment benefits.
(c)  The Division of Finance shall post receipts of revenues and other
resources of each fund when collected directly to the fund designated to
receive them.
(d)  The Division of Finance shall use budgetary accounts to:
(i)  account for budgetary funds to the extent necessary to reflect the budget
position and budget operations; and
(ii)  account for the remaining funds when administrative expenses of the
remaining funds are subject to appropriations, in order to fully reflect the
various budgetary commitments as provided by law.
(e)  The Division of Finance shall prepare statements of revenues and
expenditures in a form that accurately reflects the results of operations for
a particular fiscal period.
(f)  The Division of Finance shall determine:
(i)  all costs associated with all internal service funds that are eligible
for federal reimbursement; and
(ii)  all costs that are required to be included in the funds to comply with
generally accepted accounting principles.
(g) (i)  All costs currently borne by a fund or an account that is not an
internal service fund that should be allocated to an internal service fund may
be charged as an expense to the internal service fund, paid to the fund
bearing the costs, and recorded as interfund revenue in that fund.
(ii)  The Division of Finance may transfer the interfund revenue recorded in
funds or accounts that are not internal service funds to the internal service
fund as contributed working capital.
(h)  The Division of Finance shall record revenue in the various funds and
accounts in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.
(i) (i)  The Division of Finance and each administrative unit of state
government shall record accrued revenue net of any liabilities for revenue
refunds as required by Division of Finance policy.
(ii)  Accrued revenue may be used to offset postemployment benefit liabilities
and other liabilities of the state.
